Utah statutes.
67-19-4.   Discriminatory or prohibited employment practices.

The state, its officers, and employees shall be governed by the provisions of Section 34A-5-106 of the Utah Antidiscrimination Act concerning discriminatory or prohibited employment practices.



Amended by Chapter 65, 2003 General Session

